Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1004
Basic workweek; authority of Governor; time when effective.

The Governor shall have authority, after conferring with the employing officers concerned and with the employees, to make sections 84-1001 to 84-1005 effective to employments in any board, commission, department, or institution at any time on or after January 1, 1958.

Laws 1957, c. 398, § 4, p. 1364.

Sections 84-1001 to 84-1005, R.R.S.1943, have not been made applicable to members of the State Patrol. Roth v. Lieske, 189 Neb. 216, 201 N.W.2d 846 (1972).